Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.085

Camper.

"Camper" means a structure designed to be mounted upon a motor vehicle which provides facilities for human habitation or for temporary outdoor or recreational lodging and which is five feet or more in overall length and five feet or more in height from its floor to its ceiling when fully extended, but shall not include motor homes as defined in RCW 46.04.305.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 231 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1971 ex.s. c 231: See note following RCW 46.01.130.